Utah statutes.
4-23-4.   Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board created -- Composition -- Appointment -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Compensation.

(1)  There is created an Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board composed of the commissioner and the director of the Division of Wildlife Resources, who shall serve, respectively, as the board's chair and vice chair, together with seven other members appointed by the governor to four-year terms of office as follows:

(a)  one sheep producer representing wool growers of the state;

(b)  one cattle producer representing range cattle producers of the state;

(c)  one person from the United States Department of Agriculture;

(d)  one agricultural landowner representing agricultural landowners of the state;

(e)  one person representing wildlife interests in the state;

(f)  one person from the United States Forest Service; and

(g)  one person from the United States Bureau of Land Management.

(2)  Appointees' term of office shall commence June 1.

(3) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (3)(b), as terms of current board members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or reappointed member to a four-year term.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (3)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(5)  Attendance of five members at a duly called meeting shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of official business.  The board shall convene at the times and places prescribed by the  chair or vice chair.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

